District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.01

Security mortgages, deposits, or pawns with firearms, destructive devices, or ammunition prohibited; loan or rental of firearms, destructive devices, or ammunition prohibited.

(a)

No firearm, destructive device, or ammunition shall be security for, or be taken or received by way of any mortgage, deposit, pledge, or pawn.

(b)

No person may loan, borrow, give, or rent to or from another person, any firearm, destructive device, or ammunition.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 701, 23 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 6-2371.
1973 Ed., § 6-1871.